Illinois, session 104th, SB1078.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias 5Special Care Disclosure Act is amended by changing Section 1 6as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 4/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Special Care 10Disclosure Act.11(Source: P.A. 96-990, eff. 7-2-10.)